Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.090

Innovation academy cooperatives—Review and approval of agreement and plans by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Nonhigh school districts proposing to enter an interdistrict agreement to offer an innovation academy cooperative shall submit a copy of the proposed agreement and operating and instructional plans for the cooperative to the office of the superintendent of public instruction for technical review. The purpose of the review is for the office to provide technical assistance and advice to assure that the cooperative addresses issues identified under RCW 28A.225.250 and to assure that the proposed instructional program will offer courses and learning experiences that enable students to earn high school credit and complete a high school diploma. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must approve agreements and plans before an innovation academy cooperative begins operation.

[ 2010 c 99 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 c 99: See note following RCW 28A.340.080.